South Dakota, session 2026, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 3-4-11 be AMENDED:
3-4-11. If any position on a board or commission whose members are appointed
by the Governor with the consent of the Senate becomes vacant pursuant to § 3-4-1, the
Governor may make an interim appointment to fill the vacancy, but any and the Senate
must act upon the appointment. The interim appointment expires when the Senate acts
upon the appointee's nomination.
If the vacancy is any position on a board or commission whose members are
appointed by the Governor with the consent of the Senate becomes vacant as the result
of a resignation, the person who has resigned remains must continue to serve on the
board or commission until the earlier of:
(1) The Governor appoints a appointing another person with the consent of the Senate
or makes;
(2) The Governor making an interim appointment to fill the vacancy or until, which
must be acted upon by the Senate; or
(3) Until a date set in writing by the person who resigned, whichever is sooner.
If a person's term on the board or commission has expired, the person remains on
the board or commission until the Governor appoints another person and the Senate
consents to the appointment of the Governor's nominee or until the Governor reappoints
the same person and the Senate acts upon consents to the renomination of the person
whose term has expired.
If a person's term on a board or commission has expired and the Governor does
not nominate a another person for the new term by the tenth legislative day after the
Legislature convenes, the person whose term has expired is deemed to be renominated
for the new term and the Senate may shall act on the nomination accordingly. If a person
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.750.11 2 146
is unable to serve an additional term due to a term limit, the person is not deemed
renominated pursuant to this section and may not remain on the board or commission
pursuant to this section after the adjournment of the next legislative session after the
person's term expires.
This section applies to any board or commission whose members are appointed by
the Governor with the consent of the Senate, unless the board or commission is specifically
exempted from this section by law.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.